Utah statutes.
70A-8-101.   Definitions.
(1)  As used in this chapter:
(a)  "Adverse claim" means a claim that a claimant has a property interest in
a financial asset and that it is a violation of the rights of the claimant for
another person to hold, transfer, or deal with the financial asset.
(b)  "Bearer form," as applied to a certificated security, means a form in
which the security is payable to the bearer of the security certificate
according to its terms but not by reason of an indorsement.
(c)  "Broker" means a person defined as a broker or dealer under the federal
securities laws, but without excluding a bank acting in that capacity.
(d)  "Certificated security" means a security that is represented by a
certificate.
(e)  "Clearing corporation" means:
(i)  a person that is registered as a "clearing agency" under the federal
securities laws;
(ii)  a federal reserve bank; or
(iii)  any other person that provides clearance or settlement services with
respect to financial assets that would require it to register as a clearing
agency under the federal securities laws but for an exclusion or exemption
from the registration requirement, if its activities as a clearing
corporation, including promulgation of rules, are subject to regulation by a
federal or state governmental authority.
(f)  "Communicate" means to:
(i)  send a signed writing; or
(ii)  transmit information by any mechanism agreed upon by the persons
transmitting and receiving the information.
(g)  "Entitlement holder" means a person identified in the records of a
securities intermediary as the person having a security entitlement against
the securities intermediary.  If a person acquired a security entitlement by
virtue of Subsection 70A-8-501(2)(b) or (c), that person is the entitlement
holder.
(h)  "Entitlement order" means a notification communicated to a securities
intermediary directing transfer or redemption of a financial asset to which
the entitlement holder has a security entitlement.
(i) (i)  "Financial asset," except as otherwise provided in Section 70A-8-102,
means:
(A)  a security;
(B)  an obligation of a person or a share, participation, or other interest in
a person or in property or an enterprise of a person, which is or is of a
type, dealt in or traded on financial markets, or which is recognized in any
area in which it is issued or dealt in as a medium for investment; or
(C)  any property that is held by a securities intermediary for another person
in a securities account if that securities intermediary has expressly agreed
with the other person that the property is to be treated as a financial asset
under this chapter.
(ii)  As context requires, the term means either the interest itself or the
means by which a person's claim to it is evidenced, including a certificated
or uncertificated security, a security certificate, or a security entitlement.
(j)  "Good faith," for purposes of the obligation of good faith in the
performance or enforcement of contracts or duties within this chapter, means
honesty in fact and the observance of reasonable commercial standards of fair
dealing.
(k)  "Indorsement" means a signature that alone or accompanied by other words
is made on a security certificate in registered form or on a separate document
for the purpose of assigning, transferring, or redeeming the security or
granting a power to assign, transfer, or redeem it.
(l)  "Instruction" means a notification communicated to the issuer of an
uncertificated security which directs that the transfer of the security be
registered or that the security be redeemed.
(m)  "Registered form," as applied to a certificated security, means a form in
which:
(i)  the security certificate specifies a person entitled to the security; and
(ii)  a transfer of the security may be registered upon books maintained for
that purpose by or on behalf of the issuer, or the security certificate so
states.
(n)  "Securities intermediary" means:
(i)  a clearing corporation; or
(ii)  a person, including a bank or broker, that in the ordinary course of its
business maintains securities accounts for others and is acting in that
capacity.
(o)  "Security," except as otherwise provided in Section 70A-8-102, means an
obligation of an issuer or a share, participation, or other interest in an
issuer or in property or an enterprise of an issuer:
(i)  which is represented by a security certificate in bearer or registered
form, or the transfer of which may be registered upon books maintained for
that purpose by or on behalf of the issuer;
(ii)  which is one of a class or series or by its terms is divisible into a
class or series of shares, participations, interests, or obligations; and
(iii)  which:
(A)  is, or is of a type, dealt in or traded on securities exchanges or
securities markets; or
(B)  is a medium for investment and by its terms expressly provides that it is
a security governed by this chapter.
(p)  "Security certificate" means a certificate representing a security.
(q)  "Security entitlement" means the rights and property interest of an
entitlement holder with respect to a financial asset specified in Part 5.
(r)  "Uncertificated security" means a security that is not represented by a
certificate.
(2)  Other definitions applying to this chapter and the sections in which they
appear are:
(a)  "Appropriate person," Section 70A-8-106.
(b)  "Control," Section 70A-8-105.
(c)  "Delivery," Section 70A-8-301.
(d)  "Investment company security," Section 70A-8-102.
(e)  "Issuer," Section 70A-8-201.
(f)  "Overissue," Section 70A-8-210.
(g)  "Protected purchaser," Section 70A-8-303.
(h)  "Securities account," Section 70A-8-501.
(3)  In addition, Chapter 1a, Uniform Commercial Code - General Provisions,
contains general definitions and principles of construction and interpretation
applicable throughout this chapter.
(4)  The characterization of a person, business, or transaction for purposes
of this chapter does not determine the characterization of the person,
business, or transaction for purposes of any other law, regulation, or rule.
